Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-126
Relative; revocation of consent; form.

At any time after signing the consent form, a relative may revoke such consent form. A form for revocation of consent shall be provided by the department. The revocation shall be effective as of the time of filing the form with the department. The revocation form shall contain the following notice:

IMPORTANT NOTICE

You do not have to sign this form. If you do sign it, you are entitled to a copy of it. Your signature on this form means that the Department of Health and Human Services will not disclose your name or address to any person without a court order. If you sign this form and later decide you do want your name and address given to a relative properly requesting the information, you may file another consent for that purpose.

Laws 1980, LB 992, § 8;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 26;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 74.